California statutes. Education Code
(c) By 2010, the program shall, at a minimum, facilitate the completion of 20 district energy management plans, 15 renewable or other distributed energy systems, and three sustainable green buildings on community college campuses statewide.

(d) In consultation with the commission, the board of governors shall accomplish all of the following:

(1) Review and comment on academic, occupational, and vocational education materials developed by the commission, the Electric Power Research Institute, public utilities, and the community colleges to improve energy education programs and services.

(2) Review and recommend actions regarding successful energy education programs and services that can be identified for replication, personnel exchanges, or implementation of successful practices.

(3) Review and recommend actions regarding program resources for use by the community colleges or state agencies in improving energy education programs and services.

(4) Review exemplary programs and facilities, and recommend activities for adoption, replication, or policy advice.

(5) Review, comment, and recommend actions regarding services that will effect energy conservation.

(6) Review and comment on funding requests received to improve or enhance energy education.

(7) Review and comment on occupational and vocational training programs and services to meet current employment standards in energy occupations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 8, Sec. 2.   Effective April 12, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

81623.

The board of governors shall encourage the construction of community college sustainable green buildings that implement energy efficiency, sustainable building concepts, and solar electric, fuel cell, and other technologies. On the effective date of this article, the board of governors shall immediately seek a prototype sustainable green community college instructional building that can be a model for all new construction and retrofit projects statewide.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 8, Sec. 2.   Effective April 12, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

81624.

The Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall establish an advisory committee for the Statewide Energy Management Program, and determine the membership of that committee. The advisory committee, with technical assistance from the commission, shall make recommendations to the chancellor regarding overall program development, resource development and deployment, and strategies for implementation and coordination of the program. A leadership role on this committee shall initially be provided by the staff of the commission and DeAnza College who have been involved since 1992 in a joint effort to promote training, energy efficiency, and energy independence in the California Community Colleges. This leadership role shall rotate to other community colleges as they complete their own district energy management plans.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 8, Sec. 2.   Effective April 12, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Contracts [81641. - 81656.]

81641.

For the purpose of securing bids or proposals, the governing board of the community college district shall publish at least once a week for two weeks in some newspaper of general circulation published in the district, or if there is no such paper, then in some newspaper of general circulation, circulated in the county, and may post on the district’s Web site or through an electronic portal, a notice calling for bids or proposals, stating the work to be done or materials or supplies to be furnished and the time when and the place where bids or proposals will be opened. Whether or not bids or proposals are opened exactly at the time fixed in the public notice for opening bids or proposals, a bid or proposal shall not be received after that
 time.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 366, Sec. 1.   (AB 653)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

81644.

Continuing contracts for work to be done, services to be performed, or for apparatus or equipment to be furnished, sold, built, installed, or repaired for the district, or for materials or supplies to be furnished or sold to the district may be made with an accepted vendor as follows: for work or services, or for apparatus or equipment, not to exceed five years; for materials or supplies, not to exceed three years.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

81645.

The governing board of any community college district may contract with a party who has submitted one of the three lowest responsible competitive proposals or competitive bids for the acquisition, procurement, or maintenance of electronic data processing systems and equipment, electronic telecommunications equipment, supporting software, and related materials, goods, and services, in accordance with procedures and criteria established by the governing board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 138.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

81645.5.

In addition to utilizing the procedures specified in Article 9 (commencing with Section 81450) of Chapter 2, any community college district may, by direct sale or otherwise, sell to a purchaser any electronic data-processing equipment or other major items of equipment owned by, or to be owned by, the district, if the purchaser agrees to lease the equipment back to the district for use by the district following the sale.

The approval by the governing board of the district of the sale and leaseback shall be given only if the governing board finds, by resolution, that the equipment is data-processing equipment or another major item of equipment within the meaning of this section and that the sale and leaseback is the most economical means for providing electronic data-processing equipment or other major items of equipment to the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 173, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

81646.

Nothing in this code shall preclude the governing board of a community college district from purchasing materials, equipment, supplies, or services under the same terms and conditions as are specified in a contract lawfully awarded by the University of California or the California State University.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 366, Sec. 2.   (AB 653)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

81651.

The governing board of any community college district may purchase supplementary textbooks, library books, and educational films, audiovisual materials, test materials, workbooks, instructional computer software packages, or periodicals in any amount needed for the operation of the schools of the district without taking estimates or advertising for bids.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1340, Sec. 1.   Effective October 2, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

81653.

The governing board of any community college district may purchase from the federal government or any agency thereof any surplus property, as defined in the Surplus Property Act of 1944, in any amount needed for the operation of the schools of the district without taking estimates or advertising for bids.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

81655.

Wherever in this code the power to contract is invested in the governing board of the community college district or any member thereof, such power may by a majority vote of the board be delegated to its district superintendent, or to such persons as he may designate, or if there be no district superintendent then to such other officer or employee of the district as the board may designate. Such delegation of power may be limited as to time, money or subject matter or may be a blanket authorization in advance of its exercise, all as the governing board may direct; provided, however, that no contract made pursuant to such delegation and authorization shall be valid or constitute an enforceable obligation against the district unless and until the same shall have been approved or ratified by the governing board, said approval or ratification to be evidenced by a motion of said board duly passed and adopted. In the event of malfeasance in office, the district official invested by the governing board with such power of contract shall be personally liable to the district employing him for any and all moneys of the district paid out as a result of such malfeasance.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

81656.

The governing board by majority vote may adopt a rule, delegating to any officer or employee of the district as the board may designate, the authority to purchase supplies, materials, apparatus, equipment, and services. No such rule shall authorize any officer or employee to make any purchases involving an expenditure by the district in excess of the amount specified by Section 20651 of the Public Contract Code. The rule shall prescribe the limits of the delegation as to time, money, and subject matter. All transactions entered into by the officer or employee shall be reviewed by the governing board every 60 days.

In the event of malfeasance in office, the community college district officer or employee invested by the governing board with the power to contract shall be personally liable for any and all moneys of the district paid out as a result of the malfeasance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 680, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.5. Energy Management Systems [81660. - 81663.]

81660.

Any community college district may enter into an energy management agreement for energy management systems with any person, firm, corporation, or public agency pursuant to this article. As used in this article, “energy management systems” means solar, energy, or solar and energy management systems.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 286, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

81661.

In determining the lowest responsible bidder for an energy management system pursuant to Section 20651 of the Public Contract Code, the governing board of any community college district shall consider the net cost or savings of each system. For the purposes of this section, “net cost or savings” means the cost of the system to the district, if any, less the projected energy savings to be realized from the energy management system. The governing board may require an independent evaluation of the projected energy savings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 120.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

81662.

The term of any energy management agreement shall not exceed the estimated useful life of the energy management system, but in no event shall the term exceed 15 years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 286, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

81663.

(a) The governing board of any community college district may borrow funds from federal or state regulated financial institutions for design and construction costs associated with retrofitting buildings to become more energy efficient. The amount borrowed shall not exceed the amount that can be repaid from energy cost avoidance savings accumulated from the improvement of facilities. 

(b) Any savings association may make loans or advances of credit pursuant to subdivision (a) in an amount not in excess of 5 percent of its total assets. This investment may be in addition to any other investment savings associations are permitted to undertake.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1038, Sec. 8.   Effective October 14, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Community College Property [81670. - 81678.]

81670.

The governing board of any community college district may construct and maintain dormitories in connection with any community college within the district for use and occupancy by students in attendance at the community college, and shall fix the rates to be charged the students for quarters in the dormitories.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 251, Sec. 17.   Effective June 11, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

81676.

Any person who is employed in a bookstore maintained by a community college pursuant to this section is a member of the classified service of the district in accordance with Section 88020. In the case of a person who, immediately preceding becoming a member of the classified service of a school district pursuant to this section, was employed, other than as a student or substitute employee, in a community college bookstore maintained by a student body organization, such prior service shall, for all purposes, be deemed service in the classified service of the employing community college district.

The disposition and accounting of revenue and expenditures of the bookstore operation shall be as prescribed by the California Community Colleges Budget and Accounting Manual. Net proceeds from the operation of a community college bookstore shall be used for the general benefit of the student body as determined by the governing board. Money may be expended for services and property, including, but not limited to, parking facilities, stadia, student centers, student unions, health centers, bookstores or auxiliary facilities for use of students or faculty members of the community college or employees of the district. Funds derived from the operation of a community college bookstore shall be subject to audit pursuant to Section 84040.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1340, Sec. 2.   Effective October 2, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

81677.

The governing board of any community college district may establish and operate a fire department upon any community college campus governed by it and located wholly outside any city, fire protection district or other local agency which provides fire protection service. No such fire department shall be established until the board has first received approval in writing from the local agency formation commission for the county in which all or the major portion of such campus is located.

The board of trustees of any district within which the fire department is established pursuant to this section may enter into mutual aid agreements with other governmental agencies providing fire protection, and may contract with owners or occupants of property within the vicinity of the campus on which such department is located for fire protection service, but only during such time as such property is not within the territory of any city, fire protection district or other local agency which provides fire protection service.

Any fire department established pursuant to this section may be continued notwithstanding the subsequent annexation of any portion of the campus on which it is located to any city, fire protection district or other local agency providing fire protection service. As used in this section, the operation of a fire department shall be deemed to include the maintenance and operation of ambulances and rescue and first aid services.

During the time any department is operated pursuant to this section, the board may on behalf of its fire department maintain membership in any local, state or national group or association organized or operated for the promotion or the preservation of life and property from the hazards of fire and panic.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

81678.

(a) As provided in Section 15792 of the Government Code, community college districts are eligible for reimbursement for the purchase of equipment related to a facility, regardless of whether the facility was built or purchased with funds appropriated by the Legislature and that funding for equipment shall be provided in the same manner as for other community college facilities.

(b) On or before January 1, 1999, the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges shall adopt regulations to implement this section. However, prior to adopting these regulations, the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall consult with the Department of Finance and the Legislative Analyst.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 342, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.5. Design-Build Contracts [81700. - 81709.]

81700.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to enable community college districts to use safe and cost-effective options for building and modernizing community college facilities. The Legislature has recognized the merits of the design-build procurement process in the past by authorizing its use for projects undertaken by the University of California, specified local government projects, including school districts, and state office buildings.

(b) The Legislature also finds and declares that community college districts using a design-build contract require a clear understanding of the roles and responsibilities of each participant in the design-build process. The benefits of a
 design-build contract project delivery system include accelerated completion of the projects, cost containment, reduction of construction complexity, and reduced exposure to risk for the community college district. The Legislature also finds that the cost-effective benefits to the community college districts are achieved by shifting the liability and risk for cost containment and project completion to the design-build entity.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature to provide an optional, alternative procedure for bidding and building community college construction projects.

(d) In addition, it is the intent of the Legislature that the full scope of design, construction, and equipment awarded to a design-build entity under this chapter shall be authorized in a single funding phase. The funding phase may be authorized concurrently with, or separately from, the phase that authorizes
 the creation of the performance criteria and concept drawings.

(e) It is the intent of the Legislature that design-build procurement as authorized by this chapter shall not be construed to extend, limit, or change in any manner the legal responsibility of public agencies and contractors to comply with existing laws.

(f) In addition, it is the intent of the Legislature that design-build procurement does not replace or eliminate competitive bidding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 736, Sec. 3.   (SB 1509)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 81709.)
-------------------------------------------

81701.

As used in this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Best value” means a value determined by objective criteria and may include, but need not be limited to, price, features, functions, life-cycle costs, and other criteria deemed appropriate by the community college district.

(b) “Design-build” means a procurement process in which both the design and construction of a project are procured from a single entity.

(c) “Design-build entity” means a corporation, limited partnership, partnership, or other association that is able to provide appropriately licensed contracting, architectural, and engineering services as needed pursuant to a design-build contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 637, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 81709.)
-------------------------------------------

81702.

(a) Upon a determination by a community college district governing board that it is in the best interest of the community college district, the governing board may enter into a design-build contract for both the design and construction of a community college facility if that expenditure exceeds two million five hundred thousand dollars ($2,500,000) if, after evaluation of the traditional design, bid, and build process of community college facility construction and of the design-build process in a public meeting, the governing board makes written findings that use of the design-build process on the specific project under consideration will accomplish one of the following objectives: reduce comparable project costs, expedite the project’s completion, or provide features not achievable through the traditional design-bid-build method. The governing board shall also review the guidelines developed pursuant to Section 81706 and shall adopt a resolution approving the use of a design-build contract pursuant to this chapter prior to entering into a design-build contract.

(b) No state funds appropriated for a design-build capital outlay project may be expended until the Department of Finance and the State Public Works Board have approved performance criteria, or performance criteria and concept drawings, for the project to be financed from the appropriation for capital outlay.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 471, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2008.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 81709.)
-------------------------------------------

81703.

Design-build projects shall progress as follows:

(a) (1) The community college district governing board shall prepare a request for proposal setting forth the scope of the project that may include, but is not limited to, the size, type, and desired design character of the buildings and site, performance specifications covering the quality of materials, equipment, and workmanship, preliminary plans or building layouts, or any other information deemed necessary to describe adequately the community college district’s needs. The performance specifications and any plans shall be prepared by a design professional duly licensed or registered in this state to perform the services required by the Field Act, as defined in Section 17281. The request for proposal shall not
 include a design-build-operate contract for educational facilities pursuant to this chapter.

(2) Each request for proposal shall do all of the following:

(A) Identify the basic scope and needs of the project or contract, the expected cost range, and other information deemed necessary by the community college district to inform interested parties of the contracting opportunity.

(B) Invite interested parties to submit competitive sealed proposals in the manner prescribed by the community college district.

(C) Include a section identifying and describing the following:

(i) All significant factors and subfactors that the community college district reasonably expects to consider in evaluating
 proposals, including cost or price and all nonprice related factors and subfactors.

(ii) The methodology and rating or weighting scheme that will be used by the community college district governing board in evaluating competitive proposals and specifically whether proposals will be rated according to numeric or qualitative values.

(iii) The relative importance or weight assigned to each of the factors identified in the request for proposal.

(iv) As an alternative to clause (iii), the governing board of a community college district shall specifically disclose whether all evaluation factors other than cost or price, when combined, are any of the following:

(I) Significantly more important than cost or price.

(II) Approximately equal in importance to cost or price.

(III) Significantly less important than cost or price.

(v) If the community college district governing board wishes to reserve the right to hold discussions or negotiations with responsive bidders, it shall so specify in the request for proposal and shall publish separately or incorporate into the request for proposal applicable rules and procedures to be observed by the community college district to ensure that any discussions or negotiations are conducted in a fair and impartial manner.

(3) Notwithstanding Section 4-315 of Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations, an architect or structural engineer who is party to a design-build entity may perform the services set forth in Section 81138.

(b) The community college district shall establish a procedure to prequalify design-build entities based on the requirements specified in subdivision (b) of Section 17250.25.

(c) (1) On or after July 1, 2020, a design-build entity shall not be prequalified or shortlisted unless the entity provides an enforceable commitment to the community college district that the entity and its subcontractors at every tier will use a skilled and trained workforce to perform all work on the project or contract that falls within an apprenticeable occupation in the building and construction trades, in accordance with Chapter 2.9 (commencing with Section 2600) of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.

(2) This subdivision shall not apply if any of the following requirements are met:

(A) The community college district has entered into a project labor agreement that will bind all contractors and subcontractors performing work on the project or contract to use a skilled and trained workforce, and the entity agrees to be bound by that project labor agreement.

(B) The project or contract is being performed under the extension or renewal of a project labor agreement that was entered into by the community college district before July 1, 2020.

(C) The entity has entered into a project labor agreement that will bind the entity and all its subcontractors at every tier performing the project or contract to use a skilled and trained workforce.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, “project labor agreement” has the same meaning as in paragraph (1)
 of subdivision (b) of Section 2500 of the Public Contract Code.

(d) The community college district shall establish a procedure for final selection of the design-build entity. Selection shall be based on either of the following criteria:

(1) A competitive bidding process resulting in lump-sum bids by the prequalified or shortlisted design-build entities. Award shall be made on the basis of the lowest responsible bid.

(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this code or of Section 20650 of the Public Contract Code, a community college district may use a design-build competition based upon performance and other criteria set forth by the governing board of the community college district in the solicitation of proposals from prequalified or shortlisted design-build entities. Criteria used in this evaluation of
 proposals may include, but need not be limited to, the proposed design approach, life-cycle costs, project features, and project functions. However, competitive proposals shall be evaluated by using the criteria and source selection procedures specifically identified in the request for proposal. Once the evaluation is complete, all responsive bidders shall be ranked from the most advantageous to least advantageous to the community college district. A community college district that limits the number of responsible bidders participating in the design-build competition, at any time after a request for a proposal has been issued, shall use the source selection procedures and minimum factors set forth in subparagraph (C).

(A) An architectural firm, engineering firm, construction manager, contractor, subcontractor, consultant, or individual retained by the governing board of the community college district directly or indirectly before the award of
 the project to assist in the planning of the project, including, but not necessarily limited to, the development criteria or preparation of the request for proposal, shall not be eligible to participate in the competition with the design-build entity or to perform work on the project as a subcontractor.

(B) The award of the contract shall be made to the responsible bidder whose proposal is determined, in writing by the community college district, to be the best value to the community college district.

(C) Proposals shall be evaluated and scored solely on the basis of the factors and source selection procedures identified in the request for proposal. However, the following minimum factors shall each represent at least 10 percent of the total weight or consideration given to all criteria factors: price, technical expertise, life-cycle costs over 15 years or more, acceptable safety
 record, and, on or before July 1, 2020, skilled labor force availability.

(D) The community college district governing board shall issue a written decision supporting its contract award and stating in detail the basis of the award. The decision and the contract file must be sufficient to satisfy an external audit.

(E) Notwithstanding any provision of the Public Contract Code, upon issuance of a contract award, the community college district governing board shall publicly announce its awards identifying the contractor to whom the award is made, the winning contractor’s price proposal and its overall combined rating on the request for proposal evaluation factors. The notice of award shall also include the agency’s ranking in relation to all other responsive bidders and their respective price proposals and a summary of the community college district’s rationale for the contract
 award.

(F) For purposes of this chapter, “skilled labor force availability” means that an agreement exists with a registered apprenticeship program that has been approved pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 3070) of Division 3 of the Labor Code and has graduated apprentices in each of the immediately preceding five years. This graduation requirement shall not apply to programs providing apprenticeship training for any craft that has not been deemed by the Department of Labor and the Department of Industrial Relations to be an apprenticeable craft in the five years before enactment of the act adding this section.

(G) For purposes of this chapter, a bidder’s “safety record” shall be deemed “acceptable” if its experience modification rate for the most recent three-year period is an average of 1.00 or less, and its average total recordable injury or illness rate and average
 lost work rate for the most recent three-year period does not exceed the applicable statistical standards for its business category, or if the bidder is a party to an alternative dispute resolution system as provided for in Section 3201.5 of the Labor Code.

(H) For purposes of this chapter, when a community college district determines a design-build entity’s “experience,” the community college district shall give credit only to design-build experience and to California school design and construction experience.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 492, Sec. 1.   (AB 695)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 81709.)
-------------------------------------------

81704.

(a) Any design-build entity that is selected to design and build a project pursuant to this chapter shall possess or obtain sufficient bonding to cover the contract amount for nondesign services, and errors and omission insurance coverage sufficient to cover all design and architectural services provided in the contract. This chapter does not prohibit a general or engineering contractor from being designated the lead entity on a design-build entity for the purposes of purchasing necessary bonding to cover the activities of the design-build entity.

(b) Any payment or performance bond written for the purposes of this chapter shall use a bond form developed by the Department of General Services pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 14661 of the Government Code. The
 purpose of this subdivision is to promote uniformity of bond forms to be used on community college district design-build projects throughout the state.

(c) (1) All subcontracts that were not listed by the design-build entity in accordance with Section 81703 shall be awarded by the design-build entity in accordance with the design-build process set forth by the community college district in the design-build package.

(2) The design-build entity shall do all of the following:

(A) Provide public notice of the availability of work to be subcontracted.

(B) Provide a fixed date and time on which the subcontracted work will be awarded.

(3) Subcontractors bidding on contracts
 pursuant to this subdivision shall be afforded the protections contained in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 4100) of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.

(4) (A) If the community college district elects to award a project pursuant to this section, retention proceeds withheld by the community college district from the design-build entity shall not exceed 5 percent if a performance and payment bond, issued by an admitted surety insurer, is required in the solicitation of bids.

(B) In a contract between the design-build entity and a subcontractor, and in a contract between a subcontractor and any subcontractor thereunder, the percentage of the retention proceeds withheld shall not exceed the percentage specified in the contract between the community college district and the design-build entity. If the design-build entity provides written notice
 to any subcontractor who is not a member of the design-build entity, before or at the time the bid is requested, that a bond may be required and the subcontractor subsequently is unable or refuses to furnish a bond to the design-build entity, then the design-build entity may withhold retention proceeds in excess of the percentage specified in the contract between the community college district and the design-build entity from any payment made by the design-build entity to the subcontractor.

(5) In accordance with the provisions of applicable state law, the design-build entity may be permitted to substitute securities in lieu of the withholding from progress payments. Substitutions shall be made in accordance with Section 22300 of the Public Contract Code.

(d) (1) For contracts for public works projects awarded before January 1, 2012, the community college
 district shall establish and enforce a labor compliance program containing the requirements outlined in Section 1771.5 of the Labor Code or shall contract with a third party to operate a labor compliance program containing the requirements outlined in Section 1771.5 of the Labor Code. This requirement shall not apply to projects where the community college district or the design-build entity has entered into a collective bargaining agreement that binds all of the contractors performing work on the project.

(2) For contracts for public works projects awarded on or after January 1, 2012, until July 1, 2020, the project shall be subject to the requirements of Section 1771.4 of the Labor Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 492, Sec. 2.   (AB 695)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 81709.)
-------------------------------------------

81705.

(a) The minimum performance criteria and design standards established pursuant to this chapter by a community college district for quality, durability, longevity, and life cycle costs, and other criteria deemed appropriate by the community college district shall be adhered to by the design-build entity. Any deviations from those standards may only be allowed by written consent of the community college district. The governing board may, and is strongly encouraged to, retain the services of an architect or structural engineer throughout the course of the project in order to ensure compliance with this chapter. Any architect or structural engineer retained pursuant to this subdivision shall be duly licensed and registered in California.

(b) The community college district governing board shall be the employer of the inspector. The project inspector shall be fully independent from any member of the design-build entity and may not have any affiliation with any member of the design-build entity or any of the project subcontractors. The total price of the project shall be determined either upon receipt of the lump-sum bids as set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 81703, or by completion of the process pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 81703.

(c) The project inspector shall act under the direction of either the Director of General Services or a competent, qualified agent of the community college district.

(d) Each contract with a design-build entity shall provide that no construction or alteration of any community college facility pursuant to this section shall commence prior to the receipt of the written approval of the plans, as to the safety of design and construction, from the Department of General Services. Compliance with this provision shall be deemed to be in compliance with Section 81133.

(e) The design-build entity shall be liable for building the facility to specifications set forth in the design-build contract in the absence of contractual language to the contrary.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 637, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 81709.)
-------------------------------------------

81707.

Each community college district governing board that adopts the design-build process for a project pursuant to this chapter shall submit to the Legislative Analyst a report on the project at the completion of the project. Completion shall have the same meaning as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 7107 of the Public Contract Code. This report shall be submitted within 60 days after completion of the project. The Legislative Analyst shall submit an interim report to the Legislature by January 1, 2005, and a final report to the Legislature by January 1, 2007. The reports shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following information as to each project:

(a) The type of facility.

(b) The gross square footage of the facility.

(c) The company or contractor who was awarded the project.

(d) The estimated and actual length of time to complete the project.

(e) The estimated and actual project cost.

(f) A description of the relative merits of a project procured pursuant to this chapter and similar projects procured pursuant to other provisions of this code.

(g) A description of any written protest concerning any aspect of the solicitation, bid, proposal, or award of the design-build project, including the resolution of the protest.

(h) Other pertinent information that may be instructive in evaluating whether the design-build method of procurement should be continued, expanded, or prohibited.

(i) The findings established pursuant to Section 81702 and a postcompletion evaluation as to whether the findings were achieved.

(j) Any Labor Code violations discovered during the course of construction or following completion of the project, as well as any fines or penalties assessed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 637, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 81709.)
-------------------------------------------

81708.

A community college district shall not commence any additional design-build projects if 60 days has elapsed after completion of a design-build project without having filed the report to the Legislative Analyst’s Office required pursuant to Section 81707.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 637, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 81709.)
-------------------------------------------

81709.
